Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 4

Forensic Services for Persons with Intellectual Disabilities

33-5-401. Rehabilitation for persons with intellectual disability.

For purposes of this part, unless the context otherwise requires, “commissioner” means the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities or the commissioner's designee.

The commissioner may establish programs, including community-based programs, for training, habilitating, or rehabilitating persons with intellectual disabilities under this part.

Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; T.C.A., §§ 33-505, 33-5-301; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2006, ch. 1008, § 1; 2010, ch. 734, § 1; 2010, ch. 1100, § 43.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 5, §§ 33-5-101, 33-5-105, 33-5-201, 33-5-301 — 33-5-303, 33-5-305 — 33-5-310, 33-5-401 — 33-5-412 (Acts 1971, ch. 289, § 1; 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1976, ch. 763, § 4; 1976, ch. 764, § 3; 1978, ch. 527, § 3; 1978, ch. 667, § 2; 1980, ch. 822, § 1; 1981, ch. 224, §§ 5, 6, 10; 1982, ch. 862, § 2; 1983, ch. 323, § 10; T.C.A., §§ 33-313, 33-501, 33-505 — 33-507, 33-510, 33-515, 33-516, 33-523, 33-524, 33-1601; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 6, 8-11; 1988, ch. 828, § 2; 1989, ch. 504, § 1; 1992, ch. 981, §§ 2-13, 15; 1992, ch. 991, § 14; 1993, ch. 283, § 1; 1994, ch. 683, § 1; 1995, ch. 468, § 1; 2000, ch. 947, § 6); § 33-5-102 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; T.C.A. § 33-502), which was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 283, § 2; § 33-5-103 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; T.C.A. § 33-503), which was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 283, § 2; § 33-5-104 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1976, ch. 763, § 3; 1978, ch. 527, § 1; T.C.A. § 33-504), which was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 283, § 2; and § 33-5-304 (Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1978, ch. 527, § 2; 1978, ch. 667, § 1; 1981, ch. 224, § 8; T.C.A., § 33-508), which was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 33, is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

For the Preamble to the act regarding changing the term “mental retardation” to “intellectual disability”, please refer to Acts 2010, ch. 734.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 1 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to “mental retardation”, wherever such references appear in titles 33, 39 and 41, to “intellectual disability”, as supplements are issued and volumes are replaced.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 7 provided that for purposes of each provision amended by the act, a reference to intellectual disability shall be considered to refer to mental retardation, as defined by that provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 8 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health (now commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services), the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

33-5-402. Procedure for commitment of person under this part.

IF AND ONLY IF

a juvenile court determines in a delinquency proceeding, on the basis of an evaluation under § 37-1-128(c), that a child has an intellectual disability, OR

a circuit, criminal, or general sessions court determines on the basis of an evaluation under § 33-7-301(a) that a criminal defendant is incompetent to stand trial due to an intellectual disability, OR

a circuit or criminal court enters a verdict of not guilty by reason of insanity on a capital offense against a defendant with an intellectual disability,

THEN

the district attorney general may file a complaint to require involuntary care and treatment of the defendant under § 33-5-403, AND

only the juvenile court that has jurisdiction of the child or the circuit or criminal court before which the defendant's criminal case is pending or that would hear the case if the defendant were bound over to the grand jury has jurisdiction to hear a complaint filed under § 33-5-403.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2010, ch. 734, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding changing the term “mental retardation” to “intellectual disability”, please refer to Acts 2010, ch. 734.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 1 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to “mental retardation”, wherever such references appear in titles 33, 39 and 41, to “intellectual disability”, as supplements are issued and volumes are replaced.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 7 provided that for purposes of each provision amended by the act, a reference to intellectual disability shall be considered to refer to mental retardation, as defined by that provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 8 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Collateral References.

Jurisdiction of court to permit sterilization of mentally defective person in absence of specific statutory authority. 74 A.L.R.3d 1210.

Propriety of transferring patient found not guilty by reason of insanity to less restrictive confinement. 43 A.L.R.5th 777.

Right to counsel in insanity or incompetency adjudication proceedings. 87 A.L.R.2d 950.

33-5-403. Prerequisites to involuntary commitment.

IF AND ONLY IF

a person has an intellectual disability, AND

the person poses a substantial likelihood of serious harm under § 33-6-501 because of the intellectual disability, AND

the person needs care, training, or treatment because of the intellectual disability, AND

all available less drastic alternatives to judicial commitment are unsuitable to meet the needs of the person, AND

the district attorney general files a complaint to require involuntary care and treatment under § 33-5-402,

THEN

the person may be judicially committed to involuntary care and treatment in the custody of the commissioner in proceedings conducted in conformity with chapter 3, part 6 of this title.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2010, ch. 734, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding changing the term “mental retardation” to “intellectual disability”, please refer to Acts 2010, ch. 734.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 1 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to “mental retardation”, wherever such references appear in titles 33, 39 and 41, to “intellectual disability”, as supplements are issued and volumes are replaced.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 7 provided that for purposes of each provision amended by the act, a reference to intellectual disability shall be considered to refer to mental retardation, as defined by that provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 8 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of involuntary commitment criteria deletion, OAG 85-082, 1985 Tenn. AG LEXIS 212 (3/18/85).

33-5-404. Finding of need for involuntary commitment by designated psychologists.

No defendant may be judicially committed under § 33-5-403 unless the commissioner designates licensed physicians or licensed psychologists designated as health service providers who file in the commitment proceeding two (2) certificates of need for training and treatment certifying that the defendant satisfies the requirements of subdivisions § 33-5-403(1)-(4) and showing the factual foundation for the conclusions on each item.

Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1976, ch. 764, § 1; 1978, ch. 527, § 3; 1978, ch. 667, § 2; 1981, ch. 449, § 2(20); 1982, ch. 862, § 13; T.C.A., § 33-510; Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 9; 1992, ch. 991, § 14; T.C.A., § 33-5-305(c); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-5-405. Admission subject to availability of accommodation.

A judicially committed defendant does not come into the custody of the commissioner until the commissioner determines that the state has an available suitable accommodation and designates a licensed state facility to admit the defendant.

Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1976, ch. 764, § 1; 1978, ch. 527, § 3; 1978, ch. 667, § 2; 1981, ch. 449, § 2(20); 1982, ch. 862, § 13; T.C.A., § 33-510; Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 9; 1992, ch. 991, § 14; T.C.A. § 33-5-305(d); Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2002, ch. 730, § 29.

33-5-406. Credit on sentence for time in custody.

Whenever a person receives evaluation, training or treatment services under this part or part 5 of this chapter in connection with a criminal charge or conviction, wherever incarcerated, the person shall receive credit toward the satisfaction of the sentence for the time spent in the custody of the commissioner.

Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; 1976, ch. 763, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 33-515, 33-5-306; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-5-407. Court order as transfer.

Without regard to its wording, any court order of commitment under this part shall be considered in law as a transfer of the person to the custody of the commissioner.

Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 13; T.C.A., §§ 33-516, 33-5-307; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-5-408. Periodic evaluations.

The commissioner shall cause each person committed under § 33-5-403 or transferred under § 33-3-301 or chapter 3, part 4 of this title, to be evaluated as often as necessary but not less often than every six (6) months.

The commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall report the details of the findings of the evaluation performed under subsection (a) regarding persons with intellectual disabilities committed under § 33-5-403. The report shall include an assessment of the person's present condition and prospects for restoration to competence to stand trial, and shall be sent to the clerk of the court that ordered commitment, the person, the person's attorney, parents, spouse, legal guardian or conservator, if any, and the district attorney general.

If, upon completion of the evaluation under subsection (a), the commissioner or the commissioner's designee determines that a person with an intellectual disability transferred under § 33-3-301, no longer meets the standards under which the person was admitted, the person shall be immediately discharged or transferred to the facility from which the person was transferred or to another appropriate facility of the department under § 33-3-301.

Acts 1981, ch. 224, § 10; T.C.A., § 33-523; Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 10; T.C.A., § 33-5-308; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2010, ch. 734, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding changing the term “mental retardation” to “intellectual disability”, please refer to Acts 2010, ch. 734.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 1 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to “mental retardation”, wherever such references appear in titles 33, 39 and 41, to “intellectual disability”, as supplements are issued and volumes are replaced.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 7 provided that for purposes of each provision amended by the act, a reference to intellectual disability shall be considered to refer to mental retardation, as defined by that provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 8 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

33-5-409. Release of intellectually disabled
offenders — Delivery to custody of court.

When the commissioner or the commissioner's designee determines that any person committed under § 33-5-403, no longer meets the standards under which the person was committed, the decision maker shall immediately order the person's release and cause the person to be discharged except as provided in subsection (b) or § 33-5-410.

When the commissioner or the commissioner's designee determines that a person who was committed under § 33-5-403 and who is charged with a crime for which the person is subject to being tried is restored to competence to stand trial, the decision maker shall give notice of that fact to the clerk of the court that ordered the person's commitment and deliver the person to the custody of the sheriff of the county from which the person was admitted, who shall transport the person back to the custody of the court.

Acts 1981, ch. 224, § 11; T.C.A., §§ 33-524, 33-5-309; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-5-410. Discharge proceedings for criminal defendant involuntarily committed to an intellectual disability facility.

Whenever an intellectual disability facility determines that a person, who has been committed under § 33-5-403 by a criminal court in connection with a capital offense or with a verdict of not guilty by reason of insanity on a capital offense, no longer meets the commitment standards under which the person was committed, it shall follow the procedures set out in this section to effect the person's release from involuntary commitment.

When the intellectual disability facility determines that the person no longer meets the commitment criteria under which the person was committed, it shall notify the committing court of this fact and the reasons. The determination by the department shall create a rebuttable presumption of its correctness. The court may, within ten (10) business days, holidays excluded, of receipt of the notice, set a hearing to be held within twenty-one (21) business days, holidays excluded, of receipt of the facility's notice on whether the person continues to meet the commitment criteria under which the person was committed. The court shall send notice of the hearing to the following: the person, chief officer of the facility, the person's counsel, the person's next of kin, and the district attorney general.

If the court does not set a hearing and notify the facility within fifteen (15) business days, holidays excluded, of its receipt of the facility's notice, the facility shall release the person from involuntary commitment.

The hearing to determine whether the person continues to meet the commitment criteria under which the person was committed shall be held within twenty-one (21) business days, holidays excluded, of the court's receipt of notice from the facility. The person shall attend the hearing unless the person's presence is waived in writing by counsel before the hearing. If the person does not have counsel, the court shall appoint counsel to represent the person.

Following the hearing, if the court finds by clear, unequivocal, and convincing evidence that the person meets the standards of § 33-5-403, it shall order the person's return to the intellectual disability facility under the authority of the person's commitment. Otherwise, it shall order the person's release from commitment.

Either party may appeal a final adjudication under this section to the court of criminal appeals.

Acts 1980, ch. 822, § 1; 1982, ch. 862, § 2; T.C.A., § 33-313; Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 6; T.C.A., § 33-5-310; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2010, ch. 714, § 1; 2010, ch. 734, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding changing the term “mental retardation” to “intellectual disability”, please refer to Acts 2010, ch. 734.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 1 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to “mental retardation”, wherever such references appear in titles 33, 39 and 41, to “intellectual disability”, as supplements are issued and volumes are replaced.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 7 provided that for purposes of each provision amended by the act, a reference to intellectual disability shall be considered to refer to mental retardation, as defined by that provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Acts 2010, ch. 734, § 8 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of the act.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Mental Illness, Intellectual Disabilities, and Other Incapacities, § 5.

Collateral References.

Propriety of transferring patient found not guilty by reason of insanity to less restrictive confinement. 43 A.L.R.5th 777.